Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 4 Automotive Equipment

37-4-1.
Maintenance and repair.

Maintenance and repair of automotive equipment of the state, not otherwise or specifically assigned to any other department or agency by law, shall be vested in the department of administration, provided, however, that the maintenance and repair of motor vehicles used by the department of human services shall be vested in the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 109; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-4-1

.

37-4-2.
Automotive equipment fund established.

The general treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to establish an account to be known as the “automotive equipment fund,” which shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1643, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-4-2

.

37-4-3.
Transfers from motor equipment service rotary fund.

From time to time, as the governor shall direct, there shall be transferred to the automotive equipment fund such portions of the surplus then remaining in the motor equipment service rotary fund previously established by executive order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1643, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-4-3

.

37-4-4.
Purchase of equipment.

Within the limitation of the amounts available in the automotive equipment fund, the director of administration may from time to time provide for the replacement of outworn automotive equipment, and/or the purchase of new or used automobiles, trucks, and other equipment in the state auto pool.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1643, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1764, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-4-4

.

37-4-5.
Disbursements from fund.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment from the automotive equipment fund of such sums as may from time to time be required under the provisions of this chapter, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1643, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-4-5

.

37-4-6.
Insurance coverage.

The state of Rhode Island shall be required to provide insurance coverage on all motor vehicles owned by the state and operated by the employees of the state of Rhode Island in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per person for personal injury, three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per accident, and twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for property damage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 135, § 1.